Ohio, session 136, SB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 1751.12 and 1751.32 be amended 5
and sections 3923.811 and 3959.21 of the Revised Code be enacted 6
to read as follows: 7
Sec. 1751.12. (A)(1) No contractual periodic prepayment 8
and no premium rate for nongroup and conversion policies for 9
health care services, or any amendment to them, may be used by 10
any health insuring corporation at any time until the 11
contractual periodic prepayment and premium rate, or amendment, 12
have been filed with the superintendent of insurance, and shall 13
not be effective until the expiration of sixty days after their 14
filing unless the superintendent sooner gives approval. The 15
filing shall be accompanied by an actuarial certification in the 16
form prescribed by the superintendent. The superintendent shall 17
disapprove the filing, if the superintendent determines within 18
the sixty-day period that the contractual periodic prepayment or 19
premium rate, or amendment, is not in accordance with sound 20
actuarial principles or is not reasonably related to the 21

S. B. No. 207 Page 2
As Introduced
applicable coverage and characteristics of the applicable class 22
of enrollees. The superintendent shall notify the health 23
insuring corporation of the disapproval, and it shall thereafter 24
be unlawful for the health insuring corporation to use the 25
contractual periodic prepayment or premium rate, or amendment. 26
(2) No contractual periodic prepayment for group policies 27
for health care services shall be used until the contractual 28
periodic prepayment has been filed with the superintendent. The 29
filing shall be accompanied by an actuarial certification in the 30
form prescribed by the superintendent. The superintendent may 31
reject a filing made under division (A)(2) of this section at 32
any time, with at least thirty days' written notice to a health 33
insuring corporation, if the contractual periodic prepayment is 34
not in accordance with sound actuarial principles or is not 35
reasonably related to the applicable coverage and 36
characteristics of the applicable class of enrollees. 37
(3) At any time, the superintendent, upon at least thirty 38
days' written notice to a health insuring corporation, may 39
withdraw the approval given under division (A)(1) of this 40
section, deemed or actual, of any contractual periodic 41
prepayment or premium rate, or amendment, based on information 42
that either of the following applies: 43
(a) The contractual periodic prepayment or premium rate, 44
or amendment, is not in accordance with sound actuarial 45
principles. 46
(b) The contractual periodic prepayment or premium rate, 47
or amendment, is not reasonably related to the applicable 48
coverage and characteristics of the applicable class of 49
enrollees. 50

S. B. No. 207 Page 3
As Introduced
(4) Any disapproval under division (A)(1) of this section, 51
any rejection of a filing made under division (A)(2) of this 52
section, or any withdrawal of approval under division (A)(3) of 53
this section, shall be effected by a written notice, which shall 54
state the specific basis for the disapproval, rejection, or 55
withdrawal and shall be issued in accordance with Chapter 119. 56
of the Revised Code. 57
(B) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, a health 58
insuring corporation may use a contractual periodic prepayment 59
or premium rate for policies used for the coverage of 60
beneficiaries enrolled in medicare pursuant to a medicare risk 61
contract or medicare cost contract, or for policies used for the 62
coverage of beneficiaries enrolled in the federal employees 63
health benefits program pursuant to 5 U.S.C.A. 8905, or for 64
policies used for the coverage of medicaid recipients, or for 65
policies used for the coverage of beneficiaries under any other 66
federal health care program regulated by a federal regulatory 67
body, or for policies used for the coverage of beneficiaries 68
under any contract covering officers or employees of the state 69
that has been entered into by the department of administrative 70
services, if both of the following apply: 71
(1) The contractual periodic prepayment or premium rate 72
has been approved by the United States department of health and 73
human services, the United States office of personnel 74
management, the department of medicaid, or the department of 75
administrative services. 76
(2) The contractual periodic prepayment or premium rate is 77
filed with the superintendent prior to use and is accompanied by 78
documentation of approval from the United States department of 79
health and human services, the United States office of personnel 80

S. B. No. 207 Page 4
As Introduced
management, the department of medicaid, or the department of 81
administrative services. 82
(C) The administrative expense portion of all contractual 83
periodic prepayment or premium rate filings submitted to the 84
superintendent for review must reflect the actual cost of 85
administering the product. The superintendent may require that 86
the administrative expense portion of the filings be itemized 87
and supported. 88
(D)(1) Copayments, cost sharing, and deductibles must be 89
reasonable and must not be a barrier to the necessary 90
utilization of services by enrollees. 91
(2) A health insuring corporation, in order to ensure that 92
copayments, cost sharing, and deductibles are reasonable and not 93
a barrier to the necessary utilization of basic health care 94
services by enrollees shall impose copayment charges, cost 95
sharing, and deductible charges that annually do not exceed 96
either of the following: 97
(a) The annual limitation on cost sharing incurred under a 98
health plan under division (c) of 42 U.S.C. 18022; 99
(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(5) of 100
this section, forty per cent of the total annual cost to the 101
health insuring corporation of providing all covered health care 102
services when applied to a standard population expected to be 103
covered under the filed product in question. The 104
(ii) As used in division (D)(2)(b) of this section, "total 105
annual cost of providing a health care service is " means the 106
cost to the health insuring corporation of providing the health 107
care service to its enrollees as reduced by any applicable 108
provider discount. This requirement 109

S. B. No. 207 Page 5
As Introduced
(iii) A health insuring corporation shall be demonstrated 110
by demonstrate compliance with division (D)(2)(b) of this 111
section through an actuary who is a member of the American 112
academy of actuaries and qualified to provide such 113
certifications as described in the United States qualification 114
standards promulgated by the American academy of actuaries 115
pursuant to the code of professional conduct. 116
(3) For purposes of division (D) of this section, all of 117
the following apply: 118
(a) No health insuring corporation shall directly or 119
indirectly set, alter, implement, or condition the terms of 120
coverage, including benefit design, based in full or in part on 121
the availability or amount of financial or product assistance 122
for a prescription drug. 123
(4) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(5) of 124
this section, when calculating an enrollee's contribution to any 125
applicable copayment charges, coinsurance, cost sharing, 126
deductible, or other similar charges for a prescription drug, a 127
health insuring corporation shall include all amounts paid by 128
the enrollee and on behalf of the enrollee by another person, 129
group, or organization. 130
(5)(a) Copayments imposed by health insuring corporations 131
in connection with a high deductible health plan that is linked 132
to a health savings account are reasonable and are not a barrier 133
to the necessary utilization of services by enrollees for the 134
purposes of division (D)(1) of this section. 135
(b) Division (D)(2)(D)(2)(b) of this section does not 136
apply to a high deductible health plan that is linked to a 137
health savings account. 138

S. B. No. 207 Page 6
As Introduced
(c) Catastrophic-only plans, as defined under the "Patient 139
Protection and Affordable Care Act," 124 Stat. 119, 42 U.S.C. 140
18022 and any related regulations, are not subject to the limits 141
prescribed in division (D) of this section, provided that such 142
plans meet all applicable minimum federal requirements. 143
(d)(i) Division (D)(4)(a) of this section does not apply 144
to copayment charges, coinsurance, cost sharing, deductible, or 145
similar charges paid on behalf of an enrollee by another person, 146
group, or organization for a brand prescription drug for which 147
there is a medically appropriate generic equivalent, unless the 148
prescriber determines that the brand prescription drug is 149
medically necessary. 150
(ii) As used in division (D)(5)(d) of this section, 151
"generic equivalent" means a drug that is designated to be 152
therapeutically equivalent, as indicated by the United States 153
food and drug administration's publication titled approved drug 154
products with therapeutic equivalence evaluations. 155
(e)(i) If a health insuring corporation's compliance with 156
division (D)(2)(a) of this section would result in an enrollee 157
losing eligibility for the federal income tax deduction, under 158
26 U.S.C. 223, for a health savings account linked to a high 159
deductible plan, then that division applies only after the 160
enrollee has met the minimum deductible required by federal law; 161
(ii) Division (D)(5)(e)(i) of this section does not apply 162
with respect to items or services that are considered preventive 163
care pursuant to division (c)(2)(C) of 26 U.S.C. 223, and the 164
requirement of division (D)(2)(a) of this section applies to 165
such items or services regardless of whether the minimum 166
deductible under 26 U.S.C. 223 has been met. 167

S. B. No. 207 Page 7
As Introduced
(E) A health insuring corporation shall not impose 168
lifetime maximums on basic health care services. However, a 169
health insuring corporation may establish a benefit limit for 170
inpatient hospital services that are provided pursuant to a 171
policy, contract, certificate, or agreement for supplemental 172
health care services. 173
(F) The superintendent may adopt rules allowing different 174
copayment, cost sharing, and deductible amounts for plans with a 175
medical savings account, health reimbursement arrangement, 176
flexible spending account, or similar account; 177
(G) A health insuring corporation may impose higher 178
copayment, cost sharing, and deductible charges under health 179
plans if requested by the group contract, policy, certificate, 180
or agreement holder, or an individual seeking coverage under an 181
individual health plan. This shall not be construed as requiring 182
the health insuring corporation to create customized health 183
plans for group contract holders or individuals. 184
(H) As used in this section, "health savings account" and 185
"high deductible health plan" have the same meanings as in the 186
"Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 223, 187
as amended. 188
Sec. 1751.32. Each health insuring corporation, annually, 189
on or before the first day of March, shall file a report with 190
the superintendent of insurance, covering the preceding calendar 191
year. 192
The report shall be verified by an officer of the health 193
insuring corporation, shall be in the form the superintendent 194
prescribes, and shall include: 195
(A) A financial statement of the health insuring 196

S. B. No. 207 Page 8
As Introduced
corporation, including its balance sheet and receipts and 197
disbursements for the preceding year, which reflect, at a 198
minimum: 199
(1) All premium rate and other payments received for 200
health care services rendered; 201
(2) Expenditures with respect to all categories of 202
providers, facilities, insurance companies, and other persons 203
engaged to fulfill obligations of the health insuring 204
corporation arising out of its health care policies, contracts, 205
certificates, and agreements; 206
(3) Expenditures for capital improvements or additions 207
thereto, including, but not limited to, construction, 208
renovation, or purchase of facilities and equipment. 209
(B) A description of the enrollee population and 210
composition, group and nongroup; 211
(C) A summary of enrollee written complaints and their 212
disposition; 213
(D) A statement of the number of subscriber policies, 214
contracts, certificates, and agreements that have been 215
terminated by action of the health insuring corporation, 216
including the number of enrollees affected; 217
(E) A summary of the information compiled pursuant to 218
division (A)(5) of section 1751.04 of the Revised Code; 219
(F) A current report of the names and addresses of the 220
persons responsible for the conduct of the affairs of the health 221
insuring corporation as required by section 1751.03 of the 222
Revised Code. Additionally, the report shall include the amount 223
of wages, expense reimbursements, and other payments to these 224

S. B. No. 207 Page 9
As Introduced
persons for services to the health insuring corporation, and 225
shall include a full disclosure of the financial interests 226
related to the operations of the health insuring corporation 227
acquired by these persons during the preceding year. 228
(G) An actuarial opinion in the form prescribed by the 229
superintendent by rule; 230
(H) Certification as to whether the health insuring 231
corporation has fully and completely complied with division (D) 232
of section 1751.12 of the Revised Code during the preceding 233
year. 234
(I) Any other information relating to the performance of 235
the health insuring corporation that is necessary to enable the 236
superintendent to carry out the superintendent's duties under 237
this chapter. 238
Sec. 3923.811. (A) A sickness and accident insurer shall 239
not impose copayment charges, coinsurance, cost sharing, 240
deductible, or other similar charges that exceed the annual 241
limitation on cost sharing incurred under a health plan under 242
division (c) of 42 U.S.C. 18022. 243
(B) No sickness and accident insurer shall directly or 244
indirectly set, alter, implement, or condition the terms of 245
coverage, including benefit design, based in full or in part on 246
the availability or amount of financial or product assistance 247
for a prescription drug. 248
(C) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this 249
section, when calculating an insured's contribution to any 250
applicable copayment charges, coinsurance, cost sharing, 251
deductible, or other similar charges for a prescription drug, a 252
sickness and accident insurer shall include all amounts paid by 253

S. B. No. 207 Page 10
As Introduced
the insured and on behalf of the insured by another person, 254
group, or organization. 255
(D)(1) Division (C) of this section shall not apply to 256
copayment charges, coinsurance, cost sharing, deductible, or 257
other similar charges paid on behalf of an insured by another 258
person, group, or organization for a brand prescription drug for 259
which there is a medically appropriate generic equivalent, as 260
defined in section 1751.12 of the Revised Code, unless the 261
prescriber determines that the brand prescription drug is 262
medically necessary. 263
(2) If a sickness and accident insurer's compliance with 264
division (C) of this section would result in an insured losing 265
eligibility for the federal income tax deduction, under 26 266
U.S.C. 223, for a health savings account linked to a high 267
deductible plan, then that division applies only after the 268
insured has met the minimum deductible required by federal law. 269
(3) Division (D)(2) of this section does not apply with 270
respect to items or services that are considered preventive care 271
pursuant to division (c)(2)(C) of 26 U.S.C. 223, and the 272
requirement of division (C) of this section applies to such 273
items or services regardless of whether the minimum deductible 274
under 26 U.S.C. 223 has been met. 275
(E) On or before the first day of March each year, each 276
sickness and accident insurer operating in this state shall 277
certify to the superintendent of insurance whether the sickness 278
and accident insurer fully and completely complied with the 279
requirements of this section throughout the preceding calendar 280
year. 281
Sec. 3959.21. (A) As used in this section: 282

S. B. No. 207 Page 11
As Introduced
(1) Notwithstanding section 3959.01 of the Revised Code, 283
"pharmacy benefit manager" means any person or entity that, 284
pursuant to a contract or other relationship with an insurer, 285
managed care organization, employer, or other third party, 286
either directly or indirectly provides one or more pharmacy 287
benefit management services on behalf of a health benefit plan, 288
and any agent, contractor, intermediary, affiliate, subsidiary, 289
or related entity of such person that facilitates, provides, 290
directs, or oversees the provision of pharmacy benefit services. 291
(2) "Pharmacy benefit management service" includes all the 292
following: 293
(a) Negotiating the price of prescription drugs, including 294
negotiating and contracting for direct or indirect rebates, 295
discounts, or other price concessions; 296
(b) Processing and payment of claims for covered 297
prescription drugs; 298
(c) Managing or providing data related to a prescription 299
drug benefit; 300
(d) Processing of drug prior authorization requests; 301
(e) Adjudication of appeals or grievances related to the 302
prescription drug benefit; 303
(f) Contracting with network pharmacies; 304
(g) Controlling the cost of covered prescription drugs; 305
(h) Arranging alternative access to or funding of 306
prescription drugs; 307
(i) Performing any administrative, managerial, clinical, 308
pricing, financial, reimbursement, data administration or 309

S. B. No. 207 Page 12
As Introduced
reporting, or billing services; 310
(j) Performing any other duty directly or indirectly 311
related to the processing or payment of claims for covered 312
prescription drugs. 313
(3) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as in 314
section 3922.01 of the Revised Code. 315
(B)(1) Subject to the insurance laws and rules of this 316
state, and subject to the jurisdiction of the superintendent of 317
insurance, a pharmacy benefit manager, in the performance of 318
contracted duties, shall comply with all applicable requirements 319
and limitations concerning copayments, coinsurance, cost 320
sharing, deductibles, or other similar charges detailed in 321
sections 1751.12 and 3923.811 of the Revised Code. 322
(2) If a pharmacy benefit manager's compliance with 323
division (B)(1) of this section would result in an enrollee or 324
insured losing eligibility for the federal income tax deduction, 325
under 26 U.S.C. 223, for a health savings account linked to a 326
high deductible plan, then that division applies only after the 327
enrollee or insured has met the minimum deductible required by 328
federal law; 329
(3) Division (B)(2) of this section does not apply with 330
respect to items or services that are considered preventive care 331
pursuant to division (c)(2)(C) of 26 U.S.C. 223, and the 332
requirement of division (B)(1) of this section applies to such 333
items or services regardless of whether the minimum deductible 334
under 26 U.S.C. 223 has been met. 335
(C) No pharmacy benefit manager shall seek, conspire, or 336
contract with a health benefit plan to directly or indirectly 337
set, alter, implement, or condition the terms of the health plan 338

S. B. No. 207 Page 13
As Introduced
coverage, including benefit design, based in part or entirely on 339
information about the availability or amount of financial or 340
product assistance available for a prescription drug. 341
(D) On or before the first day of March each year, each 342
pharmacy benefit manager operating in this state shall certify 343
to the superintendent of insurance whether the pharmacy benefit 344
manager fully and completely complied with the requirements of 345
this section throughout the preceding calendar year. 346
Section 2. That existing sections 1751.12 and 1751.32 of 347
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 348
Section 3. The amendment or enactment by this act of 349
sections 1751.12, 1751.32, 3923.811, and 3959.21 of the Revised 350
Code apply to health benefit plans, as defined in section 351
3922.01 of the Revised Code, delivered, issued for delivery, 352
modified, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027. 353
Section 4. Section 1751.12 of the Revised Code is 354
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 355
by both H.B. 59 and H.B. 3 of the 130th General Assembly. The 356
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 357
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 358
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 359
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 360
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 361
presented in this act. 362